Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 314.835 is amended to read:
314.835. (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided in rules  adopted under ORS 305.193 or in
other law, it shall be unlawful for the Department of Revenue or any officer or employee of the
department to divulge or make known in any manner  the amount of income, expense, deduction,
exclusion or credit or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any report or return required in the
administration of any local tax pursuant to ORS 305.620 or required under a law  imposing a tax
upon or measured by net income. It shall be unlawful for  any person or entity to whom information
is disclosed or given by the department pursuant to ORS 314.840 (2) or any other  provision of state
law to divulge or use such information for any purpose other than that specified in  the provisions
of law authorizing the use or disclosure. No  subpoena or judicial order shall be issued compelling
the department or any of its officers  or employees, or any person who has acquired information
pursuant to ORS 314.840 (2)  or any other provision of state law to divulge or make known the
amount of  income, expense, deduction, exclusion or credit or any particulars set forth or disclosed
in any report or return except where the taxpayer’s liability for income tax is to be adjudicated  by
the court from which such process issues.
(2) For the  purposes of public records disclosure in ORS 192.311 to 192.478, or otherwise,
the confidentiality rules and requirements in  this section apply to any local government
agency and its officers and employees in the  same manner in which they apply to the De-
partment of Revenue and its officers and employees.
[(2)] (3) As used in this section:
(a) “Local government agency” means an agency, department or other subdivision  of a
local government or local service district, as those terms are  defined in ORS 174.116, that
collects, administers or manages a local tax imposed upon or measured by gross  receipts,
gross or net income, wages or net earnings from self-employment, local general sales  and
use taxes or taxes imposed under ORS 475C.453.
[(a)] (b) “Officer,” “employee”  or “person” includes an authorized representative of the officer,
employee or person, or any former officer, employee or person, or  an authorized representative of
such former officer, employee or person.
[(b)] (c) “Particulars” includes, but is not limited to, a  taxpayer’s name, address, telephone
number, Social Security number, employer identification number or  other taxpayer identification
number and the amount of refund claimed by or granted to a taxpayer.
Enrolled House Bill 4031 (HB 4031-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4031 (HB 4031-A) Page 2